Tennessee, session 114, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-318(d), is amended by deleting
the language "fourteen (14) calendar days" and substituting "ten (10) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1067
003230
- 1 -